Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-3712
Travel and Tourism Division of Department
of Economic Development; transition of employees, property, rules, regulations,
and orders; suit, action, or proceeding; how treated.

(1) For purposes of transition, employees
of the Travel and Tourism Division of the Department of Economic Development
shall be considered employees of the commission and shall retain their rights
under the state personnel system or pertinent bargaining agreement, and their
service shall be deemed continuous. This section does not grant employees
any new rights or benefits not otherwise provided by law or bargaining agreement
or preclude the commission from exercising any of the prerogatives of management
set forth in section 81-1311 or as otherwise provided by law. This section
is not an amendment to or substitute for the provisions of any existing bargaining
agreements.

(2)
All items of property, real and personal, including office furniture and fixtures,
books, documents, and records of the Travel and Tourism Division of the Department
of Economic Development shall become the property of the commission.

(3) Whenever the Travel
and Tourism Division of the Department of Economic Development is referred
to or designated by any contract or other document, such reference or designation
shall apply to the commission. All contracts entered into by the division
prior to July 1, 2012, are hereby recognized, with the commission succeeding
to all rights and obligations under such contracts. Any cash funds, custodial
funds, gifts, trusts, grants, and any appropriations of funds from prior fiscal
years available to satisfy obligations incurred under such contracts shall
be transferred and appropriated to the commission for the payment of such
obligations. All licenses, certificates, registrations, permits, seals, or
other forms of approval issued by the division shall remain valid as issued
unless revoked or their effectiveness is otherwise terminated as provided
by law. All documents and records transferred, or copies of such documents
and records, may be authenticated or certified by the commission for all legal
purposes.

(4)
All rules, regulations, and orders of the Department of Economic Development
adopted prior to July 1, 2012, shall continue to be effective until revised,
amended, repealed, or nullified pursuant to law.

(5) No suit, action, or other proceeding,
judicial or administrative, lawfully commenced prior to July 1, 2012, or which
could have been commenced prior to that date, by or against the division or
any employee thereof in his or her official capacity or in relation to the
discharge of his or her official duties, shall abate by reason of the transfer
of duties and functions from the division to the commission.

(6) On and after July 1,
2012, unless otherwise specified, whenever any provision of law refers to
the division, the law shall be construed as referring to the commission.

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 12.
July 1, 2012